tr_test.dic
nesil/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hayvansever/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hüküm/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
havhav/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
boynuz/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
tesettür/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gamma/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
cirim/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
çaygiller/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
siroko/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
vâkıf/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
avuç/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hırt/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
akkuş/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
şebeke/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
tülbent/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gusül/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
dört/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hayıf/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
davut/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
atmosfer/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mürdüm/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
akis/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kutur/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kümültü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
yahyalı/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gönül/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
tifo/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
habitat/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mazhar/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hasut/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
puşt/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
teshir/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hışım/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mabeyin/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
rüküş/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
has/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
bininci/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
dolmuş/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
öşür/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
lololo/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
akait/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kabız/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
keşif/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
perspektif/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
partilerüstü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
göğüs/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
despot/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
körkütük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
smaç/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
tröst/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
konut/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
malta/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
cürüm/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
boyun/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
koruncak/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
yakındoğu/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mahıv/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
oğul/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
yanlış/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
lake/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
neveser/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
nefis/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
siborgiyum/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ilenç/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mesul/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
sabır/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
öngörü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
şükür/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mikroskop/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mevdu/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
zerdüşt/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
analog/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
eğin/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
nutuk/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
aziz/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
büsbütün/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
paralelkenar/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
macarca/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
şilte/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gücenik/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kapanık/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
beyit/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
komprador/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
sunu/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
çeşmibülbül/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
dönüşlü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
balet/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
lafız/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
boğunç/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
cardon/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
doğalyıkım/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
dışbeslenme/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gerekmezcilik/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
güneyhaçı/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
karahöyük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kipçözüm/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kito/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
köpeküzümü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
uzunbacak/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ısınölçer/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ışılküflüce/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
anlayışsızlaşma/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
annelik/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
aristoculuk/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ağızsız/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
bantlık/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
boyunsuz/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
bozucu/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
bozuş/ЅЁѡХщЪСчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
bütünlük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
dilekçecilik/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
doğuruculuk/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
dökümcü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
emekçi/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
girişiklik/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
golsüz/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
guatemalalı/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
göklük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gönülsüz/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gözlü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
gıcıklık/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hacimsel/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hatasız/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
hüzünsüz/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ikiyüzlülük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kanaatli/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kavrulmuş/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kavuruş/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kayıtsız/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kaçmaklık/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kokuculuk/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kurucu/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kösnülü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
kötüleştiriş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mahfazalı/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mağdurluk/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
mürailik/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
müşküllük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ortaklaşalık/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
potluk/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
renklendirebilme/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
savurtuş/ГХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
sökükçü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
sütçülük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
takatlı/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
tellaklık/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
topçu/ЇѤѼХщѫѨчисбемпЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
tutumluluk/юХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
yapıntısal/ЄЀѡХщЩСчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
çağırış/ВХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
çevriliş/ДЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
çeşitlendirebilme/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
çöplükçü/МѦѽЦъѭѩшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ölçülük/ѐЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ölüş/КЃѢЦъЬТшйугзоцѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ömürsüz/ЕЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
örgencilik/яЦъТшйѧЧШьЌыЗИЖ
ıspartalılık/эХщСчиЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
'a/ІѣѼХщѪѨчирадклЎЧШьЌыЗИЖ
